Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Transporters

§ 491.
Transporter application; eligibility; use of transporter plates.

A transporter may apply for and the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, in his or her discretion, may issue a certificate of registration and a general distinguishing number plate. Before a person may be registered as a transporter, he or she shall present proof:

of compliance with section 800 of this title; and

that he or she either owns or leases a permanent place of business located in this State where business will be conducted during regularly established business hours and the required records stored and maintained.

When he or she displays thereon his or her transporter’s registration plate, a transporter or his or her employee or contractor may transport a motor vehicle owned by the transporter, repossessed, or temporarily in the transporter’s custody, and it shall be considered to be properly registered under this title. Transporter’s registration plates shall not be used for any other purposes and shall not be used by the holder of such number plates for personal purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 106

, § 2(a), eff. Feb. 1, 1966; amended

1969, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 1, 1970;

2015, No. 50

, § 2.

§ 492.
Certificate; expiration.

A transporter’s registration certificate shall contain the name, place of residence, and address of the applicant; the distinguishing number assigned; and such further information as the Commissioner may determine.
It shall expire on the last day of February next following the date of issue.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 106

, § 2(b), eff. Feb. 1, 1966.

§ 493.
Loan of plates prohibited.

A transporter shall not loan a number plate issued to him or her under this article.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 106

, § 3, eff. Feb. 1, 1966.

§ 494.
Fees.

The annual fee for a transporter’s registration certificate, number plate, or validation sticker is $123.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 106

, § 4, eff. Feb. 1, 1966; amended

1967, No. 129

, § 8;

1981, No. 87

, § 17;

1989, No. 51

, § 32;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. May 15, 2002;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 30.

§ 495.
Suspension of registration.

The Commissioner may cancel a registration certificate issued to a transporter whenever, after hearing before the Commissioner or upon conviction in any court in this State, the Commissioner finds that the transporter has violated any motor vehicle law in this State or any lawful regulation of the Commissioner applying to transporters.
A transporter whose certificate has been cancelled shall forthwith return to the Commissioner the registration certificate and the number plates furnished him or her by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 106

, § 5, eff. Feb. 1, 1966.

§ 496.
Written records.

Every transporter shall keep a written record, upon forms prescribed and furnished by the Commissioner for that purpose, of the motor vehicles upon which such transporter plate is used and the date and time during which each plate is used on a particular motor vehicle, which record shall be open to inspection by any law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 1, 1970.

§ 497.
Rulemaking.

The Commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 consistent with this chapter as may be necessary to carry their provisions into effect. The rules may prescribe what shall be requisite to obtaining or retaining a dealer registration and may, by way of illustration and not limitation, include requirements regarding maintenance of knowledge of regulatory criteria, training standards, convictions, ownership or leasehold interests in real estate, facilities, hours and days of operation, proof of compliance with any other applicable laws or rules, and any other matter or thing that, in the Commissioner’s judgment, will contribute to the registration and reasonable regulation of dealers in order to promote business, prevent fraud, and encourage fair and honest competition.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 31

, § 13.